Utah statutes.
4-23-11.   Holding a raccoon or coyote in captivity prohibited -- Penalty.
(1)  No person may hold in captivity a raccoon or coyote, except as provided
by rules of the Agricultural and Wildlife Damage Prevention Board.
(2)  The Division of Wildlife Resources, with the cooperation of the
Department of Agriculture and Food and the Department of Health, shall enforce
this section.
(3)  Any violation of this section is a class B misdemeanor.
(4)  This section does not prohibit a person from continuing to keep a raccoon
or coyote that he owns as of the effective date of this act.
